Hawaii statutes.
[§420D-12] Third-party standard. A
third-party standard for purposes of defining, reporting, and assessing overall
corporate social and environmental performance of a sustainable business
corporation subject to this chapter shall be:

(1) Comprehensive in its assessment of the effect of
the business and its operations upon the interests listed in section 420D-6(a);

(2) Developed by an organization that is independent
of the sustainable business corporation; and

(3) Transparent because the following information is
publicly available:

(A) The criteria considered when measuring
the overall social and environmental performance of a business, as well as the
relative weightings of those criteria;

(B) The identity of the directors, officers,
any material owners, and the governing body of the organization that developed
and controls revisions to the standard;

(C) The process by which revisions to the
standard are made;

(D) The process by which changes to the
membership of the governing body of the organization that developed and
controls revisions to the standard are made; and

(E) An accounting of the sources of financial
support for the organization that developed and controls revisions to the
standard, with sufficient detail to disclose any relationships that could
reasonably be considered to present a potential conflict of interest. [L 2011,
c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next